Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Parks and Recre-
ation Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Director’s office ........................ $ 941,725
(2) Central services ........................ $ 20,114,569
(3) Parks development.................... $ 4,983,803
(4) Direct services .......................... $ 71,291,958
(5) Community support
and grants ................................. $ 18,363,616
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from lottery moneys  allocated from the Parks and Natural Resources Fund to
the State Parks and Recreation Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Director’s office ........................ $ 1,521,609
(2) Central services ........................ $ 19,954,304
(3) Parks development.................... $ 16,211,364
(4) Direct services .......................... $ 59,258,532
(5) Community support
and grants ................................. $ 19,865,281
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$3,776,660 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund  to the State Parks and Recreation Department for the payment
of debt service.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the State Parks and Recreation  De-
partment for the following purposes:
Enrolled House Bill 5025 (HB 5025-A) Page 1
(1) Parks development.................... $ 1,892,853
(2) Direct services .......................... $ 2,415,941
(3) Community support
and grants................................. $ 18,493,835
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by House June 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5025 (HB 5025-A) Page 2